Hawaii statutes.
§704-404 Examination of defendant with respect
to physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect excluding fitness to proceed.
(1) Whenever there is reason to doubt the defendant's fitness to proceed, the court
may immediately suspend all further proceedings in the prosecution; provided
that for any defendant not subject to an order of commitment to a hospital for
the purpose of the examination, neither the right to bail nor proceedings
pursuant to chapter 804 shall be suspended. If a trial jury has been empanelled,
it shall be discharged or retained at the discretion of the court. The discharge
of the trial jury shall not be a bar to further prosecution.

(2) [Subsection effective until June 30,
2018. For subsection effective July 1, 2018, see below.] Upon suspension
of further proceedings in the prosecution, the court shall appoint three
qualified examiners in felony cases, and one qualified examiner in nonfelony
cases, to examine and report upon the defendant's fitness to proceed. In
felony cases, the court shall appoint as examiners at least one psychiatrist
and at least one licensed psychologist. The third examiner may be a
psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or qualified physician. One of the three
examiners shall be a psychiatrist or licensed psychologist designated by the
director of health. In nonfelony cases, the court may appoint as examiners
either a psychiatrist or a licensed psychologist. All examiners shall be
appointed from a list of certified examiners as determined by the department of
health. The court, in appropriate circumstances, may appoint an additional
examiner or examiners. The examination may be conducted while the defendant is
in custody or on release or, in the court's discretion, when necessary the
court may order the defendant to be committed to a hospital or other suitable
facility for the purpose of the examination for a period not exceeding thirty
days, or a longer period as the court determines to be necessary for the
purpose. The court may direct that one or more qualified physicians or
psychologists retained by the defendant be permitted to witness the
examination. As used in this section, the term "licensed
psychologist" includes psychologists exempted from licensure by section
465-3(a)(3) and "qualified physician" means a physician qualified by
the court for the specific evaluation ordered.

(2) [Subsection effective July 1, 2018.
For subsection effective until June 30, 2018, see above.] Upon suspension
of further proceedings in the prosecution, the court shall appoint three
qualified examiners in felony cases, and one qualified examiner in nonfelony
cases, to examine and report upon the defendant's fitness to proceed. In
felony cases, the court shall appoint as examiners at least one psychiatrist
and at least one licensed psychologist. The third examiner may be a
psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or qualified physician. One of the three
examiners shall be a psychiatrist or licensed psychologist designated by the
director of health from within the department of health. In nonfelony cases,
the court may appoint as examiners either a psychiatrist or a licensed
psychologist. All examiners shall be appointed from a list of certified
examiners as determined by the department of health. The court, in appropriate
circumstances, may appoint an additional examiner or examiners. The
examination may be conducted while the defendant is in custody or on release or,
in the court's discretion, when necessary the court may order the defendant to
be committed to a hospital or other suitable facility for the purpose of the
examination for a period not exceeding thirty days, or a longer period as the
court determines to be necessary for the purpose. The court may direct that
one or more qualified physicians or psychologists retained by the defendant be
permitted to witness the examination. As used in this section, the term
"licensed psychologist" includes psychologists exempted from
licensure by section 465-3(a)(3) and "qualified physician" means a
physician qualified by the court for the specific evaluation ordered.

(3) An examination performed under this
section may employ any method that is accepted by the professions of medicine
or psychology for the examination of those alleged to be affected by a physical
or mental disease, disorder, or defect; provided that each examiner shall form
and render an opinion upon the defendant's fitness to proceed independently
from the other examiners, and the examiners, upon approval of the court, may
secure the services of clinical psychologists and other medical or paramedical
specialists to assist in the examination.

(4) For defendants charged with felonies, the
examinations for fitness to proceed under this section and penal responsibility
under section 704-407.5 shall be conducted separately unless a combined
examination has been ordered by the court upon a request by the defendant or
upon a showing of good cause to combine the examinations. The report of the
examination for fitness to proceed shall be separate from the report of the
examination for penal responsibility unless a combined examination has been
ordered. For defendants charged with offenses other than felonies, a combined
examination is permissible when ordered by the court.

(5) The report of the examination for fitness
to proceed shall include the following:

(a) A description of the nature of the examination;

(b) An opinion as to the defendant's capacity to
understand the proceedings against the defendant and to assist in the
defendant's own defense;

(c) An assessment of the risk of danger to the
defendant or to the person or property of others for consideration and
determination of the defendant's release on conditions; and

(d) Where more than one examiner is appointed, a
statement that the opinion rendered was arrived at independently of any other
examiner, unless there is a showing to the court of a clear need for
communication between or among the examiners for clarification. A description
of the communication shall be included in the report. After all reports are
submitted to the court, examiners may confer without restriction.

(6) If the examination cannot be conducted by
reason of the unwillingness of the defendant to participate in the examination,
the report shall so state and shall include, if possible, an opinion as to
whether the unwillingness of the defendant was the result of physical or mental
disease, disorder, or defect.

(7) Three copies of the report of the
examination, including any supporting documents, shall be filed with the clerk of
the court, who shall cause copies to be delivered to the prosecuting attorney
and to counsel for the defendant.

(8) Any examiner shall be permitted to make a
separate explanation reasonably serving to clarify the examiner's opinion.

(9) The court shall obtain all existing
relevant medical, mental health, social, police, and juvenile records,
including those expunged, and other pertinent records in the custody of public
agencies, notwithstanding any other statute, and make the records available for
inspection by the examiners in hard copy or digital format. The court may
order that the records so obtained be made available to the prosecuting
attorney and counsel for the defendant in either format, subject to conditions
the court determines appropriate; provided that juvenile records shall not be
made available unless constitutionally required. No further disclosure of
records shall be made except as permitted by law. If, pursuant to this
section, the court orders the defendant committed to a hospital or other
suitable facility under the control of the director of health, then the county
police departments shall provide to the director of health and the defendant
copies of all police reports from cases filed against the defendant that have
been adjudicated by the acceptance of a plea of guilty or no contest, a finding
of guilt, acquittal, acquittal pursuant to section 704-400, or by the entry of
plea of guilty or no contest made pursuant to chapter 853; provided that the
disclosure to the director of health and the defendant does not frustrate a
legitimate function of the county police departments, with the exception of
expunged records, records of or pertaining to any adjudication or disposition
rendered in the case of a juvenile, or records containing data from the United
States National Crime Information Center. The county police departments shall
segregate or sanitize from the police reports information that would result in
the likely or actual identification of individuals who furnished information in
connection with its investigation, or who were of investigatory interest. No
further disclosure of records shall be made except as provided by law.

(10) All public agencies in possession of
relevant medical, mental health, social, police, and juvenile records, and any
other pertinent records of a defendant ordered to be examined under this
chapter, shall provide those records to the court, notwithstanding any other
state statute.

(11) The compensation of persons making or
assisting in the examination, other than those retained by a nonindigent
defendant, who are not undertaking the examination upon designation by the
director of health as part of their normal duties as employees of the State or
a county, shall be paid by the State. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 136,
§4(b); am L 1974, c 54, §1; am L 1979, c 3, §1 and c 105, §64; am L 1983, c
172, §1; am L 1987, c 145, §1; am L 1988, c 305, §5; am L 1992, c 88, §1; gen
ch 1993; am L 1997, c 306, §1; am L 2006, c 230, §6; am L 2008, c 99, §1; am L
2014, c 192, §2; am L 2016, c 198, §3 and c 231, §§4, 5]

COMMENTARY ON §704-404

This section sets forth the provisions for appropriate
medical examination of a defendant when the defendant's physical or mental
condition is made an issue either with respect to the defendant's fitness to
proceed, the defendant's responsibility for conduct, or the defendant's
capacity to have a particular state of mind.

The Code provides that, whenever the defendant's
responsibility, fitness to proceed, or physical or mental condition becomes an
issue in the case, the proceedings shall be suspended and the designated
medical examination shall take place. In taking this approach we reject the
requirement of prior notice suggested by the Model Penal Code.[1] Such a requirement
necessarily relies on the psychiatric and other medical insights of defendant's
counsel--a person manifestly without proper training in these areas. If
defense counsel does not recognize symptoms of a physical or mental disease,
disorder, or defect--either because of lack of medical knowledge or because of
lack of diligence--the consequences of his ineptness should not fall on his
client. Especially is this so where the client is unable to "communicate"
the disease, disorder, or defect to the client's attorney. The procedure
provided for examination of the defendant assures that the prosecution will not
be prejudiced in gathering evidence and in litigating these issues merely
because the defendant did not raise these issues at a preliminary stage. The
defendant or the prosecuting attorney may request, or the court may order, an
examination of the defendant at a preliminary (or later) stage in the
proceedings whenever it appears that fitness to proceed, responsibility, or
physical or mental condition is or may become an issue in the case.

Previous law provided for an examination of the defendant, at
the discretion of the court, before trial.[2] The Code allows the relevant
issues to be raised at any stage.

If an examination is ordered after a trial jury has been
empanelled, it shall be discretionary with the trial court whether or not to
discharge the jury; however the dismissal of the jury shall not bar further
prosecution by reason of former jeopardy or want or delay of prosecution.

Subsection (2) provides for the selection of examiners and is
in substantial accord with prior law. However, modifications have been made to
take into consideration the suggestions of local psychiatrists and
representatives of the department of health[3] and to accommodate those cases
involving diseases, disorders, and defects which require examination by
physicians other than psychiatrists. Also, under the Code, the court may order
that qualified physicians, which include psychiatrists, retained by the
defendant be allowed to witness and participate in the examination.

Subsection (3) clarifies what methods may be used in the
examination of the defendant; a point not covered in prior law.

Subsections (4) and (5) state explicitly what the report of
the examining physicians shall contain. This was covered under pre- existing
law by the vague provision that the defendant shall be examined "with a
view to determine the mental condition of such person and the existence of any
mental disease or defect which would affect his criminal responsibility."[4]
These subsections are intended to assure the court and the parties "that
the report will be adequate for the purpose for which the examinations and
report were ordered."[5]

Subsection (7) is designed to achieve for the examiner the
same freedom in reporting his examination that he would be afforded were he to
testify orally.[6]

Other subsections are self-explanatory.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §704-404

Act 136, Session Laws 1973, amended subsection (1) to provide
that where the issue of mental disease, disorder, or defect excluding
responsibility is raised the court "may immediately suspend all
further proceedings in the prosecution." (Emphasis added.) This
eliminated the previous mandatory requirement of suspension of the proceedings
and examination of the defendant when the issue of responsibility was
introduced. The Committee Report is silent on the reason for this. It is
believed, however, that the change arose because certain trial judges felt that
defense counsel were acting in some instances with questionable sincerity in
invoking the mandatory examination procedure. (House Standing Committee Report
No. 726 and Senate Standing Committee Report No. 858, 1973.)

Act 54, Session Laws 1974, amended subsection (2) to permit
the use of a certified clinical psychologist as part of the examination panel.

Act 3, Session Laws 1979, amended subsections (2) and (3) by
modifying the requirements for the composition of examination panels. The
purpose was to allow the courts greater flexibility in appointing mental health
professionals to examination panels, particularly in geographical areas where
shortages of various types of mental health professionals made compliance with
the requirements of the prior law burdensome and expensive.

Act 172, Session Laws 1983, amended subsections (3) and (4)
to require forensic examiners in sanity examinations to arrive at their
conclusions independently of the other examiners. Subsection (8) was amended
to allow the examiners access to police and juvenile records, including those
expunged. The legislature found that the accuracy and objectivity of sanity
examinations would be enhanced if the examiners made their findings without
collaborating with each other and if they were provided with a wider range of
information. House Conference Committee Report No. 20.

Act 145, Session Laws 1987, replaced the term "certified
clinical" psychologist with "licensed" psychologist because "certified
clinical" psychologist is an outdated classification which is no longer
applicable to current practice. Act 145 also permitted the department of
health to set minimum standards for participation and appointment of a sanity
examiner. The legislature felt this change would allow additional assurances
of higher quality testimony by these examiners. Senate Standing Committee
Report No. 691, House Standing Committee Report No. 1217.

Act 305, Session Laws 1988, included licensed psychologists
among the professionals which may provide offender examination services to the
Hawaii criminal justice system. The legislature stated that the present laws,
which permit only psychiatric evaluation, are inconsistent with the many and
varied uses the court has found for the services of licensed psychologists. Senate
Standing Committee Report No. 2153.

Act 88, Session Laws 1992, amended this section by adding a
reference to section 465-3(a)(3), which exempts psychologists employed under
government certification or civil service rules from the licensure requirement.
This is consistent with Act 314, Session Laws 1986, which intended to include
this language in sections of chapter 704 that refer to licensed psychologists.
Senate Standing Committee Report No. 2579.

Act 306, Session Laws 1997, amended subsections (2), (3), and
(4), to, inter alia, allow mental health examinations to be conducted by one
rather than three examiners, in nonfelony cases; the courts may appoint a
psychiatrist or licensed psychologist as the examiner. In felony cases, three
examiners are required, including at least one psychiatrist and one
psychologist. The amendment streamlines the process for committing and
releasing mentally incompetent defendants. Conference Committee Report No. 64.

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, amended this section to, among
other things, (1) allow all certified examiners who evaluate a defendant's
fitness to proceed or claims of physical or mental disease or disorder to
confer without restriction upon submittal of all reports to the court; and (2)
add all existing mental health records to the records that the court must
obtain and make available for inspection by examiners. House Standing
Committee Report No. 665-06.

Act 99, Session Laws 2008, amended subsection (8) by
requiring the county police departments to provide to the director of health
and a defendant who is committed to a hospital under the control of the
director, copies of certain police reports regarding that defendant. Act 99
expedited the records disclosure process for clinical evaluation purposes while
protecting a patient's right of privacy. Conference Committee Report No.
161-08.

Act 192, Session Laws 2014, amended this section to require
public agencies with a defendant's medical, mental health, social, and juvenile
records to release information to the court when the defendant is ordered to
submit to a forensic mental health examination in order to expedite the
process. The legislature found that the governor commissioned a special action
team in June 2012 to analyze causes and identify ideas to address the systemic
factors contributing to the increased rate of admission and increased length of
stay of persons admitted to the Hawaii state hospital. Act 192 resulted from
the special action team's efforts to improve the State's forensic mental health
services. Conference Committee Report No. 51-14.

Act 198, Session Laws 2016, amended this section by
separating the examination for fitness to proceed of a defendant with respect
to physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect, from the examination for
penal responsibility of the defendant with respect to physical or mental
disease, disorder, or defect [§704-407.5], with certain exceptions, in criminal
prosecutions where the defendant's capacity is at issue. The legislature found
that under §704-404, when a defendant's fitness to proceed comes into question,
the criminal proceedings are stopped, and the court must order a physical or
mental examination of the defendant to determine the defendant's fitness to
proceed and whether the defendant was penally responsible for the alleged
crime. The legislature further found that it is in the best interest of the
defendants for the examination process to proceed in a timely, expedient manner
by separating the fitness to stand trial and the penal responsibility
components of examinations. Conference Committee Report No. 153-16.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended subsections (1), (2), and
(8) to implement recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee
convened pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Law Journals and Reviews

Fitness to Proceed: Compassion or Prejudice? II HBJ, no.
13, at 135 (1998).

Case Notes

Mental examination is within sound discretion of court. 57
H. 418, 558 P.2d 1012 (1976).

Motion made prior to trial for mental examination of
defendant was not a notice of intention to rely on defense of mental
irresponsibility. 57 H. 418, 558 P.2d 1012 (1976).

Failure to impanel a board of examiners, under the
circumstances, did not violate defendant's due process rights. 60 H. 17, 586
P.2d 1028 (1978).

Impanelling of a board of examiners is within sound
discretion of court. 60 H. 17, 586 P.2d 1028 (1978).

Court appointed psychiatrists entitled to absolute immunity
from civil suit. 63 H. 516, 631 P.2d 173 (1981).

Court could have suspended trial and ordered examination
pursuant to section if defendant raised defense of physical or emotional
disease, disorder, or defect excluding capability of forming criminal intent.
73 H. 109, 831 P.2d 512 (1992).

Under subsections (1) and (2), the legislature intended that
only some rational basis for convening a panel is necessary to trigger the
trial court's power to stay the proceedings and, thereafter, to appoint
examiners. 93 H. 424, 5 P.3d 414 (2000).

Where motion for mental examination and defense counsel's
attached declaration articulated a rational basis upon which there was both "reason
to doubt" defendant's fitness to proceed and "reason to believe"
that defendant was suffering from a physical or mental disease, disorder, or
defect that had affected defendant's ability to assist in defendant's own
defense, trial court abused its discretion in refusing to stay proceedings,
failing to appoint a panel of examiners, and determining without assistance of
panel that defendant was fit to proceed. 93 H. 424, 5 P.3d 414 (2000).

When a court orders an examination to determine whether a
defendant is fit to proceed to trial pursuant to this section, and the
defendant refuses to cooperate with the examiner, the examiner must produce a
report of the examination that expressly states whether such "unwillingness
of the defendant was the result of physical or mental disease, disorder, or
defect", if possible; if it is not possible for the examiner to make that
determination, the examiner must expressly state in the report that it is not
possible to determine whether the defendant's unwillingness was the result of
physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect. 127 H. 157, 277 P.3d 251
(2012).

Standard of review of motions for judgment of acquittal in
insanity cases. 1 H. App. 1, 612 P.2d 117 (1980).

As it had no obligation under subsection (8) to unilaterally
and on its own initiative provide the police reports and other pertinent
records to its fitness examiners, trial court did not err; subsection only
requires that court "obtain" the pertinent records and "make
such records available for inspection by the examiners" and does not
require that the court, unbidden, provide such records directly to the
examiners. 97 H. 53 (App.), 33 P.3d 549 (2001).

Mentioned: 74 H. 141, 838 P.2d 1374 (1992).

__________

§704-404 Commentary:

1. M.P.C. §4.03.

2. H.R.S. §711-91; Territory v. Gaudia, 41 Haw. 231 (1955).

3. See S.B. 46 (S.D. 1) of the 1967 legislature, which passed
the Senate but failed to pass the House of Representatives. As the Senate
Committee Reports indicate, this bill was supported by many groups concerned
with mental health.

4. H.R.S. §711-91.

5. M.P.C., Tentative Draft No. 4, comments at 197 (1955).

6. Cf. §704-410(3) and (4).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next